Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2707
Garnishment; amount in excess of jurisdiction of county court; transfer to district court; proceedings certified.

Whenever proceedings under sections 25-1011 and 25-1026 to 25-1031.01, or under section 25-1056, are had in any county court and it shall appear by the pleadings or other answers to interrogatories filed by the garnishee that there is an amount in excess of the jurisdictional dollar amount specified in section 24-517, or property with a value of more than such amount, the title or ownership of which is in dispute, or when at any time during such proceedings it shall appear from the evidence or other pleadings that there is property of the value of more than the jurisdictional dollar amount specified in section 24-517, the title or ownership of which is in dispute, such court shall proceed no further. Within ten days after entry of the transfer order, the county court shall file with the district court of the county in which the action is pending a certification of the case file and costs. The matter shall be tried and determined by the district court as if the proceedings were originally had in district court, except that no new pleadings need be filed except as ordered by the district court.

Laws 1961, c. 116, § 1, p. 358;

R.S.1943, § 24-502.01;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 40;

Laws 1986, LB 749, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,1988, § 24-540;

Laws 2018, LB193, § 44.